Utah statutes.
63C-11-312.   Contracts.
Before a contest is held, a copy of the signed contract or agreement between
the promoter of the contest and each contestant shall be filed with the
commission.  Approval of the contract's terms and conditions shall be obtained
from the commission as a condition precedent to the contest.
